Hawaii statutes.
§37-74 Program execution. (a) Except
as limited by policy decisions of the governor, appropriations by the
legislature, and other provisions of law, the several agencies responsible for
administering state programs shall administer their program assignments and
shall be responsible for their proper management.

(b) [Subsection effective until June 30,
2016. For subsection effective July 1, 2016, see below.] The
appropriations by the legislature for a biennium shall be allocated between the
two fiscal years of the biennium in the manner provided in the budget or
appropriations act and as further prescribed by the director of finance. The
amounts allocated for each fiscal year shall be subject to the allotment system
prescribed in chapter 37, part II. Each agency (except the courts), in
estimating its quarterly requirements under chapter 37, part II, shall prepare
a plan for the fiscal year for the operation of each of the programs it is
responsible for administering. The operations plan shall be in such form and
content as the department of budget and finance may prescribe. It shall be
submitted, together with the estimated quarterly requirements, to the
department of budget and finance on such date as the department may prescribe.

(b) [Subsection effective July 1, 2016.
For subsection effective until June 30, 2016, see above.] The
appropriations by the legislature for a biennium shall be allocated between the
two fiscal years of the biennium in the manner provided in the budget or
appropriations act and as further prescribed by the director of finance. The
amounts allocated for each fiscal year shall be subject to the allotment system
prescribed in chapter 37, part II. Each agency (except the courts), in
estimating its quarterly requirements under chapter 37, part II, shall prepare
a plan for the fiscal year for the operation of each of the programs it is
responsible for administering. The operations plan shall be in a form and
content as the department of budget and finance may prescribe. It shall be
submitted, together with the estimated quarterly requirements, to the
department of budget and finance on a date as the department may prescribe.

(c) The department of budget and finance
shall:

(1) Review each operations plan to determine:

(A) That it is consistent with the policy
decisions of the governor and appropriations by the legislature;

(B) That it reflects proper planning and
efficient management methods; and

(C) That appropriations have been made for the
planned purpose and will not be exhausted before the end of the fiscal year;

provided that the department of budget and
finance shall review the operations plan submitted by the University of Hawaii
solely for consistency with the allotment ceilings established by the governor
under section 37-34, appropriations by the legislature, the requirements of
chapter 37D, and the status of revenues to support operations plans for all
state programs;

(2) Approve the operations plan if satisfied that it
meets the requirements under paragraph (1). Otherwise, the department of
budget and finance shall require revision of the operations plan in whole or in
part; and

(3) Modify or withhold the planned expenditures at
any time during the appropriation period if the department of budget and finance
finds that the expenditures are greater than those necessary to execute the
programs at the level authorized by the governor and the legislature, or that
state receipts and surpluses will be insufficient to meet the authorized
expenditure levels; provided that the planned expenditures for the University
of Hawaii may be modified or withheld only in accordance with sections 37-36
and 37-37.

(d) [Subsection effective until June 30,
2016. For subsection effective July 1, 2016, see below.] No appropriation
transfers or changes between programs or agencies shall be made without
legislative authorization; provided that:

(1) Authorized transfers or changes, when made, shall
be reported to the legislature;

(2) Except with respect to appropriations to fund
financing agreements under chapter 37D, the University of Hawaii shall have the
flexibility to transfer appropriated funds and positions for the operating cost
category among programs, among cost elements in a program, and between
quarters, as applicable; except with respect to appropriations to fund
financing agreements under chapter 37D, the department of education shall have
the flexibility to transfer appropriated funds and positions for the operating
cost category among programs and among cost elements in a program, and between
quarters, as applicable; and the Hawaii health systems corporation and its
regional system boards shall have the flexibility to transfer special fund
appropriations among regional system hospital facilities as applicable and as mutually
agreed to by the corporation and the respective regional system board; provided
that the Hawaii health systems corporation and the regional system boards shall
maintain the integrity and services of each individual regional system and
shall not transfer appropriations out of any regional system that would result
in a reduction of services offered by the regional system, with due regard for
statutory requirements, changing conditions, the needs of the programs, and the
effective utilization of resources; and

(3) The university and the department of
education shall account for each transfer implemented under this subsection in
quarterly reports to the governor and annual reports at the end of each fiscal
year to the legislature and the governor, which shall be prepared in the form
and manner prescribed by the governor and shall include information on the
sources and uses of the transfer.

(d) [Subsection effective July 1, 2016.
For subsection effective until June 30, 2016, see above.] No appropriation
transfers or changes between programs or agencies shall be made without
legislative authorization; provided that:

(1) Authorized transfers or changes, when made, shall
be reported to the legislature;

(2) Except with respect to appropriations to fund financing
agreements under chapter 37D, the University of Hawaii may transfer
appropriated funds and positions for the operating cost category among
programs, among cost elements in a program, and between quarters, as
applicable; except with respect to appropriations to fund financing agreements
under chapter 37D, the department of education may transfer appropriated funds
and positions for the operating cost category among programs and among cost
elements in a program, and between quarters, as applicable; and the Hawaii
health systems corporation and its regional system boards may transfer special
fund appropriations among regional system hospital facilities as applicable and
as mutually agreed to by the corporation and the respective regional system
board; provided that the Hawaii health systems corporation and the regional
system boards shall maintain the integrity and services of each individual
regional system and shall not transfer appropriations out of any regional
system that would result in a reduction of services offered by the regional
system, with due regard for statutory requirements, changing conditions, the
needs of the programs, and the effective utilization of resources; and

(3) The university and the department of education
shall account for each transfer implemented under this subsection in quarterly
reports to the governor and annual reports at the end of each fiscal year to
the legislature and the governor, which shall be prepared in the form and
manner prescribed by the governor and shall include information on the sources
and uses of the transfer.

(e) [Subsection effective July 1, 2016.] For
the purpose of this subsection, "unanticipated federal moneys" means
financial aid from the federal government that is not appropriated in the budget
or supplemental budget act. After June 30, 2017, unanticipated federal moneys
may be expended when and in the manner authorized by proviso in the budget or
supplemental budget act and shall be deemed an appropriation for the purpose of
article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii.

[(f)] [Subsection effective July 1, 2016.]
Effective July 1, 2017, no funds shall be expended to fill a permanent or
temporary position for the lowest level of a program if the filling of that
position causes the position ceiling for that level of the program to be
exceeded; provided that this subsection shall not apply to a:

(1) Position established by the University of Hawaii
or the Hawaii health systems corporation;

(2) Position that is entirely federally funded;

(3) Position necessary for compliance, without undue
delay, with a court order or decree if the director of human resources
development determines that recruitment through normal civil service procedures
would result in delay or noncompliance;

(4) Position approved by the governor for a special,
research, or demonstration project of an agency;

(5) Position approved by the governor to perform an
emergency management function under the department of defense pursuant to the
authority of section 127A‑12(b)(9);

(6) Casual hire position;

(7) Vicing position;

(8) Position established by an agency pursuant to
express statutory authorization to establish the position; and

(9) Position established by an agency for a program
or project funded by an appropriation in an act other than a general or
supplemental appropriations act. [L 1970, c 185, §13; ren L 1972, c 72, §3; am
L 1974, c 219, §6; am L 1986, c 320, §5; am L 1989, c 370, §2; am L 1994, c
281, §§4, 9; am L 1995, c 11, §21, c 161, §7, and c 211, §6; am L 1996, c 262,
§5; am L 1998, c 41, §5 and c 115, §10; am L 2004, c 51, §53; am L 2007, c 290,
§10; am L 2015, c 148, §4 and c 160, §7]

Note

Applicability of 2015 amendments. L 2015, c 148, §6 and c
160, §11.

Cross References

Special and revolving fund reviews, see §§23-11 and 23-12.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next